cs: Ladění kastanět: Vysoké; Nízké; Střední; Smíšený pár; Jiné
ro-RO: teren de castaniete: Înalt; Grav; Mediu; Pereche mixtă; Altele
th: ระดับเสียงของกรับสเปน: สูง; ต่ำ; กลาง; คู่แบบผสม; อื่นๆ
ru: Тональность кастаньет: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Смешанная пара; Другое
hu: Kasztanyetták hangmagassága: Magas; Mély; Közepes; Vegyes pár; Egyéb
ja: カスタネットのピッチ: 高; 低; 中; ミックスペア; その他
pt-BR: Afinação das castanholas: Agudo; Grave; Médio; Par misto; Outros
fr: Hauteur des castagnettes: Aigu; Grave; Moyen; Paire mixte; Autre
hr-HR: Vrh kastanjeta: Visoki; Niski; Srednji; Mješoviti par; Ostalo
it: Campo di nacchere: Alto; Basso; Medio; Coppia mista; Altro
nb: Kastanjetter tonehøyde: Høy; Lav; Middels; Blandet par; Annet
sl-SI: Tonska višina kastanjet: Visok; Nizek; Srednji; Mešan par; Drugo
zh-CN: 响板音高: 高音; 低音; 中音; 混合对; 其他
es: Tono de las castañuelas: Agudo; Grave; Medio; Par mixto; Otro
zh-TW: 響板音高: 高音; 低音; 中音; 混合音一對; 其他
sk-SK: Rozstup kastanetov: Vysoké; Nízke; Stredné; Zmiešaný pár; Iné
pl: Wysokość dźwięku kastanietów: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Para mieszana; Inny
tr: Kastanyet perde değeri: Tiz; Pes; Orta; Karışık çift; Diğer
nl: Castanets toonhoogte: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Gemengd paar; Overig
sv: Kastanjetton: Hög; Låg; Medium; Blandat par; Övrigt
en: Castanets pitch: High; Low; Medium; Mixed pair; Other
vi: Cao độ castanet: Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Cặp hỗn hợp; Khác
ko: 캐스터네츠 피치: 고음; 저음; 중음; 혼합 쌍; 기타
bg-BG: Височина на звука на кастанетите: Висок; Нисък; Среден; Смесен чифт; Други
lt-LT: Kastanječių tonas: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Mišri pora; Kita
de: Tonhöhe der Kastagnetten: Hoch; Tief; Mittel; Gemischtes Paar; Sonstiges
el: Τονικό ύψος καστανιέτων: Υψηλός; Χαμηλός; Μεσαίος; Μεικτό ζεύγος; Άλλο
fi: Kastanjettien sävelkorkeus: Korkea; Matala; Keskikorkea; Sekapari; Muu
pt-PT: Tom das castanholas: Agudo; Grave; Médio; Par misto; Outro
da: Kastanjetternes tonehøjde: Høj; Lav; Mellem; Blandet par; Andet